packages/commonvoice-utils/commonvoice-utils-0.2.16.tar.gz/commonvoice-utils-0.2.16/cvutils/data/cv/phon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%>

LEXICON Root 

Vow ;
Cns ; 


LEXICON Loop

Vow ; 
Cns ; 
# ; 


LEXICON Vow 

а:a CnsAfterVow ;
а:ɑ CnsAfterVow ;
ӑ:ə CnsAfterVow ;
ӑ:ɒ CnsAfterVow ;

ы:ɯ CnsAfterVow ;
э:e CnsAfterVow ;
ю:ju CnsAfterVow ;
ю:ʲu CnsAfterVow ;
я:ja CnsAfterVow ;
я:ʲa CnsAfterVow ;

и:i CnsAfterVow ;
й:j CnsAfterVow ;

е:ɛ CnsAfterVow ;
ё:jo CnsAfterVow ;
ё:ʲo CnsAfterVow ;
ӗ:ɘ CnsAfterVow ;
ӗ:ø CnsAfterVow ;

о:o CnsAfterVow ;
у:u CnsAfterVow ;
у:o CnsAfterVow ;
ӳ:y CnsAfterVow ;

LEXICON Cns

б:b Loop ;
в:ʋ Loop ;
в:w Loop ;
в:v Loop ;
г:ɡ Loop ;
д:d Loop ;
ж:ʐ Loop ;
з:z Loop ;
к:k Loop ;
к:kʲ Loop ;
к:c Loop ;
к:gʲ Loop ;
к:ɟ Loop ;
л:l Loop ;
л:ɫ Loop ;
л:lʲ Loop ;
л:ʎ Loop ;
м:m Loop ;
н:n Loop ;
н:nʲ Loop ;
н:ɲ Loop ;
п:p Loop ;
п:b Loop ;
р:r Loop ;
р:ɾ Loop ;
с:s Loop ;
с:s̬ Loop ;
с:z Loop ;
ҫ:ɕ Loop ;
ҫ:ɕ̬ Loop ;
ҫ:ʑ Loop ;
т:t Loop ;
т:d Loop ;
т:tʲ Loop ;
т:dʲ Loop ;
ф:f Loop ;
ф:v Loop ;
х:χ Loop ;
х:χʲ Loop ;
х:ɣ Loop ;
х:ɣʲ Loop ;
ц:ts Loop ;
ц:dz Loop ;
ч:tɕ Loop ;
ч:ʥ Loop ;
ш:ʃ Loop ;
ш:ʒ Loop ;
щ:ɕː Loop ;


LEXICON CnsAfterVow

б:b Loop ;
в:ʋ Loop ;
в:w Loop ;
в:v Loop ;
г:ɡ Loop ;
д:d Loop ;
ж:ʐ Loop ;
з:z Loop ;
к:c Loop ;
к:gʲ Loop ;
к:ɟ Loop ;
л:l Loop ;
л:ɫ Loop ;
л:lʲ Loop ;
л:ʎ Loop ;
м:m Loop ;
н:n Loop ;
н:nʲ Loop ;
н:ɲ Loop ;
п:b Loop ;
р:r Loop ;
с:z Loop ;
ҫ:ʑ Loop ;
т:d Loop ;
т:dʲ Loop ;
ф:v Loop ;
х:χ Loop ;
х:χʲ Loop ;
х:ɣ Loop ;
х:ɣʲ Loop ;
ц:dz Loop ;
ч:ʥ Loop ;
ш:ʒ Loop ;
щ:ɕː Loop ;

Loop "weight: 1.0" ; 
